District of Columbia statutes.
28-3806

Attorney’s fees.

With respect to a consumer credit sale or direct installment loan the agreement may provide for the payment by the consumer of reasonable attorney’s fees not in excess of 15% of the unpaid balance of the obligation.

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 670, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(o), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 28-3806.
1973 Ed., § 28-3806.